Utah statutes.
78A-2-223.   Decisions to be rendered within two months -- Procedures for decisions not rendered.

(1)  A trial court judge shall decide all matters submitted for final determination within two months of submission, unless circumstances causing the delay are beyond the judge's personal control.

(2)  The Judicial Council shall establish reporting procedures for all matters not decided within two months of final submission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

